Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial

148.580.
Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial Committee — Purpose — Members — Duties — Responsibilities of cabinet.

There is established an Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial Committee for the purpose of creating an Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial in the city of Frankfort, Kentucky, or another location within the Commonwealth deemed more appropriate by the committee. Members of the committee shall include:

The Governor or his or her designee;

The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs or his or her designee;

The Adjutant General of the Kentucky Department of Military Affairs or his or her designee; and

A member recommended by the Joint Executive Council of Veterans Organizations to be appointed by the Governor.

The Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial Committee shall be charged with the following duties:

Choosing a design for the memorial;

Determining a location for the memorial;

Collecting the names of fallen service men and women to be included on the memorial;

Requesting proposals for the construction of the memorial;

Making recommendations on an entity to oversee the installation of the memorial;

Making recommendations on an entity that will be responsible for maintenance and day-to-day upkeep of the memorial; and

Seeking appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and any other funds, both public and private, to assist with the costs associated with the establishment of the memorial, which shall be deposited in the Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial fund established in KRS 148.582.

The Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial Committee shall complete the requirements of subsection (2)(a) to (f) of this section no later than October 1, 2012. The committee shall produce a written report to be provided to the Governor, the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The report shall include, at a minimum, the following information:

The results of the Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial Committee’s work with regard to the requirements of subsection (2)(a) to (f) of this section;

An update on the costs required to complete the Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial; and

The amount of money raised for the Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial at the date the report is due.

The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall have the following responsibilities related to the Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial and the committee established to create the memorial:

Provision of staff and administrative resources, not including reimbursement for any expense related to the committee’s work, for the committee; and

Administration of the Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial fund established in KRS 148.582.

History.
Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 67, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

148.582.
Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial fund.

The Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial fund is hereby created as a separate trust fund in the State Treasury. The Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial fund shall consist of amounts received from appropriations and any other proceeds from gifts, grants, federal funds, or any other funds, both public and private, made available for the purposes of KRS 148.580 and this section.

The Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial fund shall be administered by the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet.

Amounts deposited in the Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial fund shall be used only for the purpose of the establishment of the Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial as provided in KRS 148.580.

Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial fund shall become a part of the Iraq/Afghanistan War Memorial fund and shall not lapse.

Moneys deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section and shall not be appropriated or transferred by the General Assembly for any other purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 67, § 2, effective July 12, 2012.

148.585.
Harrodsburg Sestercentennial Commission — Duties — Membership. [Effective until January 2, 2027]

As used in this section:

“Commission” means the Harrodsburg Sestercentennial Commission established in subsection (2) of this section; and

“Sestercentennial” means the two hundred fiftieth anniversary of the founding of Harrodsburg on June 16, 1774.

The Harrodsburg Sestercentennial Commission is hereby established to plan, encourage, develop, and coordinate events and other activities related to the two hundred fiftieth anniversary of Harrodsburg in 2024. To accomplish its charge, the commission shall:

Ensure that adequate way-finding signage and mapping is accomplished to mark and identify Old Fort Harrod State Park;

Educate citizens of the Commonwealth and the nation about the stories of pioneers and Native Americans in the early days of westward settlement and the impact Harrodsburg and settlements of its nature had on Kentucky and American history;

Plan and implement events for a year-long sestercentennial commemoration in the year 2024 of the founding of Harrodsburg and whatever events in the immediately preceding and following years are deemed appropriate by the commission, including any battlefield commemorations if funds are available;

Assist local governments and their representatives with planning, preparation, and grant applications for sestercentennial events and projects;

Coordinate federal, state, local, and nonprofit organizations’ sestercentennial activities occurring in Kentucky;

Coordinate events and activities with parties, commissions, and organizations wishing to participate in the 2024 commemoration;

Act as a point of contact for national organizations wishing to distribute information to state and local groups about grant opportunities, meetings, and national events related to the settlement of Harrodsburg and sestercentennial activities;

Seek funding sources such as foundations, line item appropriations, federal grants, philanthropic organizations, and lineage societies;

Create press, print, and electronic contacts that generate stories on a continual basis;

Encourage and contract new publications and create a call for papers on Harrodsburg, Fort Harrod, James Harrod, or other participating or involved parties, and how the history of this early frontier settlement impacted American history;

Organize symposiums and other methodologies to investigate genealogy relative to Harrodsburg;

Create higher and lower educational programs;

Perform other duties necessary to educate Kentuckians on the history of Harrodsburg and early frontier settlements and on the Commonwealth’s role in early westward expansion;

Evaluate the existing infrastructure of Old Fort Harrod State Park, provide recommendations for what infrastructure should be in place for the successful undertaking of appropriate events and activities in accordance with this section, and coordinate with state and local bodies to make necessary infrastructure improvements; and

Coordinate planning for the sestercentennial with the nonprofit organization Harrodsburg 250th, Inc., this organization having been established by the local governments of Harrodsburg and Mercer County to serve as the point of contact for local planning for the sestercentennial.

The commission shall consist of the following eleven (11) members:

The secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet or his or her designee;

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet or his or her designee;

Two (2) members from the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, appointed by the secretary of the cabinet;

One (1) member from the Kentucky Heritage Council, appointed by the state historic preservation officer;

One (1) member of the Kentucky Humanities Council, appointed by the chair of the council;

One (1) member of Harrodsburg 250th, Inc., recommended by the chair of that organization and appointed by the Governor;

One (1) member of the Friends of Fort Harrod, recommended by the leader of that organization and appointed by the Governor; and

Three (3) citizen members appointed by the Governor, one (1) of whom shall be designated as the chair.

The Harrodsburg Sestercentennial Commission shall be attached to the Kentucky Historical Society for administrative purposes only.

This section shall expire on January 1, 2027.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 194, § 1, effective April 7, 2021.

148.586.
Kentucky State Parks Centennial Commission — Duties — Membership. [Effective until January 1, 2025]

The Kentucky State Parks Centennial Commission is established to plan and implement events to celebrate the one hundredth anniversary of the state parks system in 2024. To accomplish its charge, the commission shall:

Assist local governments and organizations with planning, preparation, and grant applications for parks centennial events and projects;

Coordinate events and activities with parties, commissions, and organizations wishing to participate in the centennial celebration;

Seek funding sources such as foundations, line item appropriations, federal grants, and philanthropic organizations;

Establish press, print, and electronic contacts that generate stories on a continual basis; and

Perform other duties necessary to highlight Kentucky’s parks system during its one hundredth year.

The Kentucky State Parks Centennial Commission shall consist of the following nine (9) members:

The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet or his or her designee;

One (1) additional member from the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, appointed by the secretary;

One (1) member from the Kentucky Historical Society, appointed by the executive director of the society;

One (1) member from the Kentucky Heritage Council, appointed by the state historic preservation officer;

Three (3) members selected by the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet who work in onsite park leadership; and

Two (2) citizen members, one (1) of whom shall be designated as the chair and appointed by the Governor.

The Kentucky State Parks Centennial Commission shall be attached to the Kentucky Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet for administrative purposes only.

This section shall expire on January 1, 2025.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 194, § 2, effective April 7, 2021.

148.587.
Kentucky Sestercentennial Commission — Duties — Membership. [Effective until January 1, 2027]

As used in this section:

“Commission” means the Kentucky Sestercentennial Commission established in subsection (2) of this section; and

“Sestercentennial” means the two hundred fiftieth anniversary of historic events from 1774 to 1776 that include the founding of Harrodsburg in 1774, the opening of Boone Trace in 1775, the genesis of westward movement, and the important events tied to our nation’s founding in 1776.

The Kentucky Sestercentennial Commission is hereby established to plan and implement events to celebrate the two hundred fiftieth anniversary of Old Fort Harrod in 2024, culminating with the Declaration of Independence in 1776. To accomplish its charge, the commission shall:

Elect a chair of the commission and have the authority to form subcommittees and working groups that include non-commission members in order to plan, develop, and coordinate specific activities;

Plan, encourage, develop, and coordinate the commemoration of the two hundred fiftieth anniversary of the founding of the United States and recognize Kentucky’s integral role in that event and the impact of its people on the nation’s past, present, and future;

Ensure that adequate way-finding signage and mapping is accomplished to mark and identify the relevant points of interest and routes involved in the founding of Kentucky and the opening of the west;

Educate citizens of the Commonwealth and the nation about the stories of pioneers, African Americans, and Native Americans in the early days of westward settlement and the impact Fort Harrod and Fort Boonesborough had on Kentucky and American history;

Plan and implement events for a three (3) year sestercentennial commemoration of the years 2024 to 2026 and following years deemed appropriate by the commission, including any battlefield commemorations if funds are available;

Assist local governments with planning, preparation, and grant applications for sestercentennial events and projects;

Coordinate federal, state, local, and nonprofit organizations’ sestercentennial activities occurring in Kentucky;

Coordinate events and activities with parties, commissions, and organizations wishing to participate in the commemoration;

Seek funding sources such as foundations, line item appropriations, federal grants, philanthropic organizations, and lineage societies;

Establish press, print, and electronic contacts that generate stories on a continual basis;

Encourage and contract new publications and create a call for papers on how the history of this early frontier settlement impacted American history;

Organize symposiums and other methodologies to investigate genealogy relative to the events involved in the founding of Kentucky and opening of the west;

Create higher and lower educational programs; and

Perform other duties necessary to educate Kentuckians on the history of early frontier settlements and on the Commonwealth’s role in early westward expansion and to highlight the importance of the years 1774 to 1776 to Kentucky history.

The commission shall consist of the following fourteen (14) members:

The secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet or his or her designee;

One (1) member from the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet appointed by the secretary of the cabinet;

One (1) member from the Kentucky Heritage Council, appointed by the state historic preservation officer;

One (1) member from the Kentucky Humanities Council, appointed by the chair of the council;

One (1) member of the Friends of Fort Harrod, recommended by the leader of that organization and appointed by the Governor;

Three (3) citizen members appointed by the Governor, one (1) of whom shall be designated as the chair;

The commissioner of the Department of Parks or his or her designee;

The president of Friends of Boone Trace, Inc. or his or her designee;

The president of the Fort Boonesborough Foundation, or his or her designee;

One (1) member from the Kentucky African American Heritage Commission appointed by the chair of that commission;

One (1) member of the Kentucky Native American Heritage Commission appointed by the chair of that commission; and

One (1) member of the Kentucky Historical Society appointed by the executive director of the society.

The Kentucky Sestercentennial Commission shall be attached to the Kentucky Historical Society for administrative purposes only.

This section shall expire on January 1, 2027.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 194, § 3, effective April 7, 2021.